Hawaii statutes.
PART I.
CONDEMNATION OF PRIVATE PROPERTY

§101-1 Definitions. In this part,
except where the context otherwise requires:

"County" means a county (except the
county of Kalawao) and any agency of a county, including the board of water
supply thereof, duly authorized to exercise the power of eminent domain.

"Plaintiff" means the State or any
county or the public utility or other authority duly authorized to exercise the
power of eminent domain.

"State" means the State or any agency
of the State duly authorized to exercise the power of eminent domain. [L 1951,
c 12, §1(a); RL 1955, §8-1; HRS §101-1]

Revision Note

Numeric designations deleted.

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next